apertium-kgp.kgp.twol
Alphabet
 A Á Ã B C Ç D E É Ẽ F G H I Ĩ J K L M N O Ó Õ P Q R S T U Ũ V W Y Ỹ Z ’
 a á ã b c ç d e é ẽ f g h i ĩ j k l m n o ó õ p q r s t u ũ v w y ỹ z
 %{A%}:a %>:0

 !%{n%}:n %{h%}:h
 %{n%}:0 %{h%}:0
 % :%  % :0           ! space
 ;

Sets

Vowel = A Á Ã E É Ẽ I Ĩ O Ó U Ũ Ỹ
        a á ã e é ẽ i ĩ o ó u ũ ỹ;
Voiceless = S T P K J
            s t p k j;
ChangeAfterNH = S T J
                s t j;

Rules

"testing rule"
a:a <=> _ ;

!"Remove n when h, space, and j follow it"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ %{h%}: % : ChangeAfterNH: ;

!"Remove h when space and j follow it"
!%{h%}:0 <=> _ % : ChangeAfterNH: ;

!"Remove space after {n}{h}"
!% :0 <=> %{n%}: %{h%}: _ ChangeAfterNH: ;

!"Replace t with s when it follows nh and space"
!t:s <=> %{n%}: %{h%}: % :  _ ;

!@ i:i {n}:0 {h}:0 " :0" j:j é:é

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
